Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-516
Department of Health and Human Services;
participants in aid to dependent children; collect data and information.

The Department of Health
and Human Services shall collect the following data and information yearly:

(1) The total number
of participants in the aid to dependent children program described in section
43-512 pursuing an associate degree;

(2) Graduation rates of such participants, the number
of participants that are making satisfactory progress in their educational
pursuits, and the length of time participants participate in education to
fulfill their work requirement under the program;

(3) The monthly earnings, educational
level attained, and employment status of such participants at six months and
at twelve months after terminating participation in the aid to dependent children
program; and

(4)
A summary of activities performed by the department to promote postsecondary
educational opportunities to participants in the aid to dependent children
program.

Laws 2012, LB842, § 2.